test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_anneed_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Verb - anneeđ: # MS checked
    anneeđ+V+Inf: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anam
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: anah
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aṇa
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: anneen
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: aṇevettee
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: anneev
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: anneep
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: aṇevetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: aṇeh
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: oonnim
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: oonnih
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oonij
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oonijm
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oonijd
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oonijn
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oonijd
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: onnii
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: anneeii
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg1: anaččim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg2: anaččih
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Sg3: anaččij
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du1: anaččáim
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du2: anaččáid
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Du3: anaččáin
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl1: anaččijm
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl2: anaččijd
    anneeđ+V+Cond+Pl3: anaččii
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg1: aaneem
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg2: aaneeh
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Sg3: ooniš
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du1: onižeen
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du2: oonišvettee
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Du3: onižává
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl1: onižep
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl2: oonišvetteđ
    anneeđ+V+Pot+Pl3: onižeh
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: annoom
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ane
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: anos
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: annoon
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: annee
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: annoos
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: annop
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: anneeđ
    anneeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: annoos
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ane
    anneeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: annaam
    anneeđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: anaččii
    anneeđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: aanaa
    anneeđ+V+PrsPrc: annee
    anneeđ+V+PrfPrc: annaam
    anneeđ+V+Actio: anneem
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ess: anemin
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Loc: anemist
    anneeđ+V+Actio+Ill: anemân
    anneeđ+V+Ger: anedijn
    anneeđ+V+VAbess: [anehennáá, anehinnáá, anehánnáá]


  Verb - jotteeđ: # MS checked
    jotteeđ+V+Inf: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jođám
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jođáh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jotá
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: jotteen
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: jotevettee
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: jotteev
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: jotteep
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: jotevetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joteh
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juuttim
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juuttih
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juuđij
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: juuđijm
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: juuđijd
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: juuđijn
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: juuđijm
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juuđijd
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juttii
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg1: jođáččim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg2: jođáččih
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Sg3: jođáččij
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du1: jođáččáim
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du2: jođáččáid
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Du3: jođáččáin
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl1: jođáččijm
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl2: jođáččijd
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+Pl3: jođáččii
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg1: joođeem
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg2: joođeeh
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Sg3: juuđiš
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du1: juđižeen
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du2: juuđišvettee
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Du3: juđižává
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl1: juđižep
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl2: juuđišvetteđ
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+Pl3: juđižeh
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: jottoom
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: jođe
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: jođos
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du1: jootton
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du2: jottee
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Du3: jottoos
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: jottoop
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: jotteeđ
    jotteeđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: jottoos
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: jođe
    jotteeđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: jottáám
    jotteeđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: jođáččii
    jotteeđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: joođáá
    jotteeđ+V+PrsPrc: jottee
    jotteeđ+V+PrfPrc: jottáám
    jotteeđ+V+Actio: jotteem
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ess: jotemin
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Loc: jotemist
    jotteeđ+V+Actio+Ill: jotemân
    jotteeđ+V+Ger: jođedijn
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jođehennáá
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jođehinnáá
    jotteeđ+V+VAbess: jođehánnáá


  Verb - kalveđ: # MS checked
    kalveđ+V+Inf: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaˊlvam
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaˊlvah
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalva
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalveen
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalvevettee
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalvev
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalvep
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalvevetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalveh
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolvim
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolvih
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koolvij
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: koolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: koolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: koolvijn
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koolvijm
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koolvijd
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolvii
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kaˊlvaččim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kaˊlvaččih
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kaˊlvaččij
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du1: kaˊlvaččáim
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du2: kaˊlvaččáid
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Du3: kaˊlvaččáin
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kaˊlvaččijm
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kaˊlvaččijd
    kalveđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kaˊlvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kalveem
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kalveeh
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Sg3: koolviš
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du1: koˊlvižeen
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du2: koolvišvettee
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Du3: koˊlvižává
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl1: koˊlvižep
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl2: koolvišvetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Pot+Pl3: koˊlvižeh
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kalˊvoom
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kaˊlve
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kaˊlvos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kalˊvoon
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kalˊvee
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kalˊvoos
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kalˊvoop
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kalˊvoos
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaˊlve
    kalveđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalvam
    kalveđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kalvaččii
    kalveđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kalvaa
    kalveđ+V+PrsPrc: kalvee
    kalveđ+V+PrfPrc: kalˊvam
    kalveđ+V+Actio: kalvem
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalvemin
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalvemist
    kalveđ+V+Actio+Ill: kalvemân
    kalveđ+V+Ger: kaˊlvedijn
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kaˊlvehennáá
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kaˊlvehinnáá
    kalveđ+V+VAbess: kaˊlehánnáá
